Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 23. Lien on Ditches

38-23-101.
Liability of co-owners.

All co-owners of unincorporated irrigating ditches shall pay for the necessary cleaning and repairing of such ditches in the proportion that their respective interests bear to the total expenses incurred in said cleaning and repairing. Any such co-owner may perform labor in cleaning and repairing such ditch equivalent in value to his share of such expenses. No co-owner shall be held liable for cleaning or repairing any ditch below the point from which he takes his portion of the water.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 312, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 4051.

C.L.

§ 6468.

CSA:

C. 101, § 41.

CRS 53:

§ 86-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-4-1.

38-23-102.
Request to clean ditch.

Upon the failure of any one or more of several coowners, upon written request of the owners of one-third of the carrying capacity or board of directors, to assist in cleaning and repairing such ditch, the other coowners shall proceed to clean and repair the same and shall keep an accurate account of the cost and expenses incurred and upon the completion of such work shall deliver to each of such delinquent coowners or his agent, lessee, or legal representative an itemized statement of such costs and expenses.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 312, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 4052.

C.L.

§ 6469.

CSA:

C. 101, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 86-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-4-2.

38-23-103.
Lien of co-owner against delinquent.

The co-owners of any such ditch who clean and repair the same, as specified in section 38-23-102, shall have a lien upon the interest in such ditch owned by such delinquent co-owner for his proportion of such cost and expenses.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 312, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 4053.

C.L.

§ 6470.

CSA:

C. 101, § 43.

CRS 53:

§ 86-4-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-4-3.

38-23-104.
Claimant to file verified statement.

Any person wishing to avail himself of the provisions of this article shall file for record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein the ditch to be affected by the lien is situated, within thirty days after the completion of such work, a statement addressed to the owner of the interest upon which such lien is claimed, specifying the name of the ditch and the extent of the interest in the same upon which such lien is claimed; the date upon which the work was commenced and the date it was completed; the total amount expended on such ditch and the amount due from such delinquent coowners. Said statement shall be signed and verified upon oath by a claimant.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 313, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 4054.

C.L.

§ 6471.

CSA:

C. 101, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 86-4-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-4-4.

38-23-105.
Lien may be assigned - effect.

Any party claiming a lien under the provisions of this article may assign in writing his claim and lien to any person, who shall thereafter have all the rights and remedies of the assignor.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 313, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 4055.

C.L.

§ 6472.

CSA:

C. 101, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 86-4-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-4-5.

38-23-106.
Lien duration - action prolongs.

No lien claimant by virtue of this article shall hold the property longer than six months after filing the statement described in section 38-23-104 unless an action is commenced within that time to enforce the same.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 313, § 6.

R.S. 08:

§ 4056.

C.L.

§ 6473.

CSA:

C. 101, § 46.

CRS 53:

§ 86-4-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-4-6.

38-23-107.
Judgment - execution.

Actions to enforce liens claimed by virtue of this article shall be commenced and prosecuted in accordance with the procedure in other civil actions in the state of Colorado. Each party who establishes his claim under this article shall have a judgment against the party personally liable to him for the full amount of his claim so established and shall have a lien decreed and determined upon the ditch interest to which his lien has attached to the extent of his said claims; but no judgment shall exceed the interest of the party in such ditch, nor shall execution issue against other than his interest in said ditch.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 313, § 7.

R.S. 08:

§ 4057.

C.L.

§ 6474.

CSA:

C. 101, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 86-4-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-4-7.

38-23-108.
Sale - right of redemption.

The court shall cause such ditch interest to be sold in satisfaction of said lien and costs, as in the case of foreclosure of mortgages and in the manner and form provided for sales on executions issued out of courts of record, and the owner and creditors shall have a right to redeem, as is provided for in cases of sales of real estate on execution.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 313, § 8.

R.S. 08:

§ 4058.

C.L.

§ 6475.

CSA:

C. 101, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 86-4-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-4-8.

38-23-109.
Costs.

The plaintiff if successful shall also recover all other costs and expenses incurred in claiming and enforcing his lien.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 314, § 9.

R.S. 08:

§ 4059.

C.L.

§ 6476.

CSA:

C. 101, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 86-4-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-4-9.

38-23-110.
Releasing lien - penalty for delay.

The claimant of any such lien, the statement of which has been recorded, on the payment of the amount claimed together with costs of making and recording such statement and costs of satisfaction, at the request of any person interested in the ditch interest charged therewith, shall enter of record satisfaction of the same, and if he neglects or refuses to do so within ten days after such request, he shall forfeit and pay to the person making such request the sum of ten dollars for every day of such neglect or refusal, to be recovered in the same manner as other debts. Any such statement may be canceled on the margin of the record by an acknowledgment of satisfaction over the signature of the claimant or an agent authorized in writing.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 314, § 10.

R.S. 08:

§ 4060.

C.L.

§ 6477.

CSA:

C. 101, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 86-4-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-4-10.